District of Columbia statutes.
10-1015

Repealed

Green building priority.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806j
as added Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-234, § 14, 54 DCR 377
Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-349, § 3(b), 58 DCR 724
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).
Delegation of Authority-Green Building Act of 2006, see Mayor’s Order 2007-206, September 21, 2007 ( 55 DCR 125).
Section 48 of D.C. Law 19-171 amended subsection (a) of this section as it existed prior to its repeal.